Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2816
Submission of proposals; sealed; rank of design-builders and progressive design-builders; negotiation of contract.

(1) Design-builders and progressive design-builders shall submit proposals as required by the request for proposals. A contracting agency may meet with individual design-builders and progressive design-builders prior to the time of submitting the proposal and may have discussions concerning alternative technical concepts. If an alternative technical concept provides a solution that is equal to or better than the requirements in the request for proposals and the alternative technical concept is acceptable to the contracting agency, it may be incorporated as part of the proposal by the design-builder or progressive design-builder. Notwithstanding any other provision of state law to the contrary, alternative technical concepts shall be confidential and not disclosed to other design-builders, progressive design-builders, or members of the public from the time the proposals are submitted until such proposals are opened by the contracting agency.

(2) Proposals shall be sealed and shall not be opened until expiration of the time established for making the proposals as set forth in the request for proposals.

(3) Proposals may be withdrawn at any time prior to the opening of such proposals in which case no stipend shall be paid. The contracting agency shall have the right to reject any and all proposals at no cost to the contracting agency other than any stipend for design-builders who have submitted responsive proposals. The contracting agency may thereafter solicit new proposals using the same or different project performance criteria or may cancel the design-build or progressive design-build solicitation.

(4) The contracting agency shall rank the design-builders or progressive design-builders in order of best value pursuant to the criteria in the request for proposals. The contracting agency may meet with design-builders or progressive design-builders prior to ranking.

(5) The contracting agency may attempt to negotiate a design-build or progressive design-build contract with the highest ranked design-builder or progressive design-builder selected by the contracting agency and may enter into a design-build or progressive design-build contract after negotiations. If the contracting agency is unable to negotiate a satisfactory design-build or progressive design-build contract with the highest ranked design-builder or progressive design-builder, the contracting agency may terminate negotiations with that design-builder or progressive design-builder. The contracting agency may then undertake negotiations with the second highest ranked design-builder or progressive design-builder and may enter into a design-build or progressive design-build contract after negotiations. If the contracting agency is unable to negotiate a satisfactory contract with the second highest ranked design-builder or progressive design-builder, the contracting agency may undertake negotiations with the third highest ranked design-builder or progressive design-builder, if any, and may enter into a design-build or progressive design-build contract after negotiations.

(6) If the contracting agency is unable to negotiate a satisfactory contract with any of the ranked design-builders or progressive design-builders, the contracting agency may either revise the request for proposals and solicit new proposals or cancel the design-build or progressive design-build process under sections 39-2808 to 39-2824.

Laws 2016, LB960, § 16;

Laws 2019, LB583, § 10;

Laws 2022, LB1016, § 9.